Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 8 State Parks and Reserves

Cross references. —

As to Grand Teton national park, see §

36-10-201

et seq.

As to public parks in cities and towns, see §

15-7-301

et seq.

As to county parks, see chapter 9 of title 18.

As to game and fish, see title 23.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Protecting the Wildlife Resources of National Parks from External Threats,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1987).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d Parks, Squares and Playgrounds § 1 et seq.; 63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Lands § 1 et seq.

Nature of estate conveyed by deed for park or playground purposes, 15 ALR2d 975.

Construction of highway through park as violation of use to which park property may be devoted, 60 ALR3d 581.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving park, recreational, wilderness and related projects, 75 ALR Fed 738.